Arkansas, session 2025, SB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 105, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 2 — Physician Assistant Licensure Compact

17-105-201. Text of compact.
The Physician Assistant Licensure Compact is enacted into law and
entered into by this state with all states legally joining therein and in the
form substantially as follows:
PA LICENSURE COMPACT

Section 1. Purpose
In order to strengthen access to Medical Services, and in recognition of the
advances in the delivery of Medical Services, the Participating States of the
PA Licensure Compact have allied in common purpose to develop a comprehensive
process that complements the existing authority of State Licensing Boards to
license and discipline PAs and seeks to enhance the portability of a License
to practice as a PA while safeguarding the safety of patients. This Compact
allows Medical Services to be provided by PAs, via the mutual recognition of
*JMB017*
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
the Licensee’s Qualifying License by other Compact Participating States. This
Compact also adopts the prevailing standard for PA licensure and affirms that
the practice and delivery of Medical Services by the PA occurs where the
patient is located at the time of the patient encounter, and therefore
requires the PA to be under the jurisdiction of the State Licensing Board
where the patient is located. State Licensing Boards that participate in this
Compact retain the jurisdiction to impose Adverse Action against a Compact
Privilege in that State issued to a PA through the procedures of this
Compact. The PA Licensure Compact will alleviate burdens for military
families by allowing active duty military personnel and their spouses to
obtain a Compact Privilege based on having an unrestricted License in good
standing from a Participating State.

Section 2. Definitions
In this Compact:
A. “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil, equitable, or
criminal action permitted by a State’s laws which is imposed by a Licensing
Board or other authority against a PA License or License application or
Compact Privilege such as License denial, censure, revocation, suspension,
probation, monitoring of the Licensee, or restriction on the Licensee’s
practice.
B. “Compact Privilege” means the authorization granted by a Remote
State to allow a Licensee from another Participating State to practice as a
PA to provide Medical Services and other licensed activity to a patient
located in the Remote State under the Remote State’s laws and regulations.
C. “Conviction” means a finding by a court that an individual is
guilty of a felony or misdemeanor offense through adjudication or entry of a
plea of guilt or no contest to the charge by the offender.
D. “Criminal Background Check” means the submission of fingerprints or
other biometric-based information for a License applicant for the purpose of
obtaining that applicant’s criminal history record information, as defined in
28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), from the State’s criminal history record repository as
defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
E. “Data System” means the repository of information about Licensees,
including but not limited to License status and Adverse Actions, which is
created and administered under the terms of this Compact.
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
F. “Executive Committee” means a group of directors and ex-officio
individuals elected or appointed pursuant to Section 7.F.2.
G. “Impaired Practitioner” means a PA whose practice is adversely
affected by health-related condition(s) that impact their ability to
practice.
H. “Investigative Information” means information, records, or
documents received or generated by a Licensing Board pursuant to an
investigation.
I. “Jurisprudence Requirement” means the assessment of an individual’s
knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the practice of a PA in a State.
J. “License” means current authorization by a State, other than
authorization pursuant to a Compact Privilege, for a PA to provide Medical
Services, which would be unlawful without current authorization.
K. “Licensee” means an individual who holds a License from a State to
provide Medical Services as a PA.
L. “Licensing Board” means any State entity authorized to license and
otherwise regulate PAs.
M. “Medical Services” means health care services provided for the
diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health condition,
injury, or disease, as defined by a State’s laws and regulations.
N. “Model Compact” means the model for the PA Licensure Compact on
file with The Council of State Governments or other entity as designated by
the Commission.
O. “Participating State” means a State that has enacted this Compact.
P. “PA” means an individual who is licensed as a physician assistant
in a State. For purposes of this Compact, any other title or status adopted
by a State to replace the term “physician assistant” shall be deemed
synonymous with “physician assistant” and shall confer the same rights and
responsibilities to the Licensee under the provisions of this Compact at the
time of its enactment.
Q. “PA Licensure Compact Commission,” “Compact Commission,” or
“Commission” mean the national administrative body created pursuant to
Section 7.A of this Compact.
R. “Qualifying License” means an unrestricted License issued by a
Participating State to provide Medical Services as a PA.
S. “Remote State” means a Participating State where a Licensee who is
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
not licensed as a PA is exercising or seeking to exercise the Compact
Privilege.
T. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the
force and effect of law.
U. “Significant Investigative Information” means Investigative
Information that a Licensing Board, after an inquiry or investigation that
includes notification and an opportunity for the PA to respond if required by
State law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proven true, would
indicate more than a minor infraction.
V. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States.

Section 3. State Participation in this Compact
A. To participate in this Compact, a Participating State shall:
1. License PAs.
2. Participate in the Compact Commission’s Data System.
3. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints against Licensees and License applicants.
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of this
Compact and Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action against a Licensee or
License applicant and the existence of Significant Investigative Information
regarding a Licensee or License applicant.
5. Fully implement a Criminal Background Check requirement,
within a time frame established by Commission Rule, by its Licensing Board
receiving the results of a Criminal Background Check and reporting to the
Commission whether the License applicant has been granted a License.
6. Comply with the Rules of the Compact Commission.
7. Utilize passage of a recognized national exam such as the
NCCPA PANCE as a requirement for PA licensure.
8. Grant the Compact Privilege to a holder of a Qualifying
License in a Participating State.
B. Nothing in this Compact prohibits a Participating State from
charging a fee for granting the Compact Privilege.

Section 4. Compact Privilege
A. To exercise the Compact Privilege, a Licensee must:
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
1. Have graduated from a PA program accredited by the
Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant,
Inc. or other programs authorized by Commission Rule.
2. Hold current NCCPA certification.
3. Have no felony or misdemeanor Conviction.
4. Have never had a controlled substance license, permit, or
registration suspended or revoked by a State or by the United States Drug
Enforcement Administration.
5. Have a unique identifier as determined by Commission Rule.
6. Hold a Qualifying License.
7. Have had no revocation of a License or limitation or
restriction on any License currently held due to an adverse action.
8. If a Licensee has had a limitation or restriction on a
License or Compact Privilege due to an Adverse Action, two years must have
elapsed from the date on which the License or Compact Privilege is no longer
limited or restricted due to the Adverse Action.
9. If a Compact Privilege has been revoked or is limited or
restricted in a Participating State for conduct that would not be a basis for
disciplinary action in a Participating State in which the Licensee is
practicing or applying to practice under a Compact Privilege, that
Participating State shall have the discretion not to consider such action as
an Adverse Action requiring the denial or removal of a Compact Privilege in
that State.
10. Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is seeking
the Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
11. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirement of a Remote State in
which the Licensee is seeking to practice under the Compact Privilege and pay
any fees applicable to satisfying the Jurisprudence Requirement.
12. Report to the Commission any Adverse Action taken by a non-
participating State within thirty (30) days after the action is taken.
B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration or revocation
of the Qualifying License unless terminated pursuant to an Adverse Action.
The Licensee must also comply with all of the requirements of Subsection A
above to maintain the Compact Privilege in a Remote State. If the
Participating State takes Adverse Action against a Qualifying License, the
Licensee shall lose the Compact Privilege in any Remote State in which the
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
Licensee has a Compact Privilege until all of the following occur:
1. The License is no longer limited or restricted; and
2. Two (2) years have elapsed from the date on which the License
is no longer limited or restricted due to the Adverse Action.
C. Once a restricted or limited License satisfies the requirements of
Subsection B.1 and 2, the Licensee must meet the requirements of Subsection A
to obtain a Compact Privilege in any Remote State.
D. For each Remote State in which a PA seeks authority to prescribe
controlled substances, the PA shall satisfy all requirements imposed by such
State in granting or renewing such authority.

Section 5. Designation of the State from Which Licensee is Applying for a
Compact Privilege
A. Upon a Licensee’s application for a Compact Privilege, the Licensee
shall identify to the Commission the Participating State from which the
Licensee is applying, in accordance with applicable Rules adopted by the
Commission, and subject to the following requirements:
1. When applying for a Compact Privilege, the Licensee shall
provide the Commission with the address of the Licensee’s primary residence
and thereafter shall immediately report to the Commission any change in the
address of the Licensee’s primary residence.
2. When applying for a Compact Privilege, the Licensee is
required to consent to accept service of process by mail at the Licensee’s
primary residence on file with the Commission with respect to any action
brought against the Licensee by the Commission or a Participating State,
including a subpoena, with respect to any action brought or investigation
conducted by the Commission or a Participating State.

Section 6. Adverse Actions
A. A Participating State in which a Licensee is licensed shall have
exclusive power to impose Adverse Action against the Qualifying License
issued by that Participating State.
B. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a Remote
State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing State due process
law, to do all of the following:
1. Take Adverse Action against a PA’s Compact Privilege within
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
that State to remove a Licensee’s Compact Privilege or take other action
necessary under applicable law to protect the health and safety of its
citizens.
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that
require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production
of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a Licensing Board in a Participating State
for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence
from another Participating State shall be enforced in the latter State by any
court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of
that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it.
The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage
and other fees required by the service statutes of the State in which the
witnesses or evidence are located.
3. Notwithstanding paragraph 2, subpoenas may not be issued by a
Participating State to gather evidence of conduct in another State that is
lawful in that other State for the purpose of taking Adverse Action against a
Licensee’s Compact Privilege or application for a Compact Privilege in that
Participating State.
4. Nothing in this Compact authorizes a Participating State to
impose discipline against a PA’s Compact Privilege or to deny an application
for a Compact Privilege in that Participating State for the individual’s
otherwise lawful practice in another State.
C. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Participating State
which issued the Qualifying License shall give the same priority and effect
to reported conduct received from any other Participating State as it would
if the conduct had occurred within the Participating State which issued the
Qualifying License. In so doing, that Participating State shall apply its own
State laws to determine appropriate action.
D. A Participating State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may
recover from the affected PA the costs of investigations and disposition of
cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against that PA.
E. A Participating State may take Adverse Action based on the factual
findings of a Remote State, provided that the Participating State follows its
own procedures for taking the Adverse Action.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Participating State
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
by its respective State PA laws and regulations or other applicable State
law, any Participating State may participate with other Participating States
in joint investigations of Licensees.
2. Participating States shall share any investigative,
litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under this Compact.
G. If an Adverse Action is taken against a PA’s Qualifying License,
the PA’s Compact Privilege in all Remote States shall be deactivated until
two (2) years have elapsed after all restrictions have been removed from the
State License. All disciplinary orders by the Participating State which
issued the Qualifying License that impose Adverse Action against a PA’s
License shall include a Statement that the PA’s Compact Privilege is
deactivated in all Participating States during the pendency of the order.
H. If any Participating State takes Adverse Action, it promptly shall
notify the administrator of the Data System.

Section 7. Establishment of the PA Licensure Compact Commission
A. The Participating States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency and national administrative body known as the PA Licensure
Compact Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact
States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The
Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the
Compact as set forth in Section 11.A.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Participating State shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that Participating State’s Licensing Board or, if the
State has more than one Licensing Board, selected collectively by the
Participating State’s Licensing Boards.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current PA, physician or public member of a Licensing
Board or PA Council/Committee; or
b. An administrator of a Licensing Board.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as
provided by the laws of the State from which the delegate is appointed.
4. The Participating State Licensing Board shall fill any
vacancy occurring in the Commission within sixty (60) days.
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all
matters voted on by the Commission and shall otherwise have an opportunity to
participate in the business and affairs of the Commission. A delegate shall
vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws
may provide for delegates’ participation in meetings by telecommunications,
video conference, or other means of communication.
6. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in this Compact and the
bylaws.
7. The Commission shall establish by Rule a term of office for
delegates.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:
1. Establish a code of ethics for the Commission;
2. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
3. Establish fees;
4. Establish bylaws;
5. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
6. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;
7. Promulgate Rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation
and administration of this Compact. The Rules shall have the force and effect
of law and shall be binding in all Participating States;
8. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name
of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing Board to
sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
9. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
10. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Participating State;
11. Hire employees and engage contractors, elect or appoint
officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of this Compact, and establish the
Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of
interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
12. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and receive, utilize and
dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
13. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of,
or otherwise own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal or
mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance
of impropriety;
14. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
15. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
16. Borrow money;
17. Appoint committees, including standing committees composed
of members, State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
18. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with,
law enforcement agencies;
19. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and such
other officers of the Commission as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
20. Reserve for itself, in addition to those reserved
exclusively to the Commission under the Compact, powers that the Executive
Committee may not exercise;
21. Approve or disapprove a State’s participation in the Compact
based upon its determination as to whether the State’s Compact legislation
departs in a material manner from the Model Compact language;
22. Prepare and provide to the Participating States an annual
report; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent with the State
regulation of PA licensure and practice.
D. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant
to this subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings
shall be posted on the Commission’s website at least thirty (30) days prior
to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection D.1 of this section, the
Commission may convene a public meeting by providing at least twenty-four
(24) hours prior notice on the Commission’s website, and any other means as
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
provided in the Commission’s Rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense
with notice of proposed rulemaking under Section 9.L.
3. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting or
non-public part of a public meeting to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Participating State with its
obligations under this Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other
matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel practices and
procedures;
c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative
reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other
committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of
compliance issues pursuant to this Compact;
j. Legal advice; or
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or Participating States’ statutes.
4. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to
this provision, the chair of the meeting or the chair’s designee shall
certify that the meeting or portion of the meeting may be closed and shall
reference each relevant exempting provision.
5. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
accurate summary of actions taken, including a description of the views
expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting
shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the
Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
from each Participating State and may impose Compact Privilege fees on
Licensees of Participating States to whom a Compact Privilege is granted to
cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its
staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget
as approved by the Commission each year for which revenue is not provided by
other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount levied on Participating
States shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by Commission
Rule.
a. A Compact Privilege expires when the Licensee’s
Qualifying License in the Participating State from which the Licensee applied
for the Compact Privilege expires.
b. If the Licensee terminates the Qualifying License
through which the Licensee applied for the Compact Privilege before its
scheduled expiration, and the Licensee has a Qualifying License in another
Participating State, the Licensee shall inform the Commission that it is
changing to that Participating State the Participating State through which it
applies for a Compact Privilege and pay to the Commission any Compact
Privilege fee required by Commission Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior
to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any of the Participating States, except by and with the
authority of the Participating State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under
its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed
public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included
in and become part of the annual report of the Commission.
F. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf
of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact and Commission
Rules.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine (9)
members:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the Commission
from the current membership of the Commission;
b. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
national PA professional association; and
c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
national PA certification organization.
3. The ex-officio members will be selected by their respective
organizations.
4. The Commission may remove any member of the Executive
Committee as provided in its bylaws.
5. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
6. The Executive Committee shall have the following duties and
responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the Commission changes to the Commission’s
Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees to be paid by
Compact Participating States such as annual dues, and any Commission Compact
fee charged to Licensees for the Compact Privilege;
b. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
e. Monitor Compact compliance of Participating States and
provide compliance reports to the Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary;
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
g. Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during
the interim between Commission meetings, except for issuing proposed
rulemaking or adopting Commission Rules or bylaws, or exercising any other
powers and duties exclusively reserved to the Commission by the Commission’s
Rules; and
h. Perform other duties as provided in the Commission’s
Rules or bylaws.
7. All meeting of the Executive Committee at which it votes or
plans to vote on matters in exercising the powers and duties of the
Commission shall be open to the public and public notice of such meetings
shall be given as public meetings of the Commission are given.
8. The Executive Committee may convene in a closed, non-public
meeting for the same reasons that the Commission may convene in a non-public
meeting as set forth in Section 7.D.3 and shall announce the closed meeting
as the Commission is required to under Section 7.D.4 and keep minutes of the
closed meeting as the Commission is required to under Section 7.D.5.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability,
both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to
or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred,
or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed
to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,
injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the
Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties,
or responsibilities, or as determined by the commission that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that
person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the Commission
for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
4. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses in any proceedings as
authorized by Commission Rules.
5. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which
shall be governed solely by any other applicable State laws.
6. Nothing herein shall be construed to designate the venue or
jurisdiction to bring actions for alleged acts of malpractice, professional
misconduct, negligence, or other such civil action pertaining to the practice
of a PA. All such matters shall be determined exclusively by State law other
than this Compact.
7. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Participating State’s state action immunity or state
action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman
Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or anticompetitive
law or regulation.
8. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the Participating States or by the Commission.

Section 8. Data System
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated data and reporting system
containing licensure, Adverse Action, and the reporting of the existence of
Significant Investigative Information on all licensed PAs and applicants
denied a License in Participating States.
B. Notwithstanding any other State law to the contrary, a
Participating State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all
PAs to whom this Compact is applicable (utilizing a unique identifier) as
required by the Rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a License or Compact Privilege;
4. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial (excluding the reporting of any Criminal history record
information where prohibited by law);
5. The existence of Significant Investigative Information; and
6. Other information that may facilitate the administration of
this Compact, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
C. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in
any Participating State shall only be available to other Participating
States.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all Participating States of
any Adverse Action taken against a Licensee or an individual applying for a
License that has been reported to it. This Adverse Action information shall
be available to any other Participating State.
E. Participating States contributing information to the Data System
may, in accordance with State or federal law, designate information that may
not be shared with the public without the express permission of the
contributing State. Notwithstanding any such designation, such information
shall be reported to the Commission through the Data System.
F. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Participating State
contributing the information shall be removed from the Data System upon
reporting of such by the Participating State to the Commission.
G. The records and information provided to a Participating State
pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business
records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay
exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative
proceedings in a Participating State.

Section 9. Rulemaking
A. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules adopted thereunder.
Commission Rules shall become binding as of the date specified by the
Commission for each Rule.
B. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer this Compact and achieve
its purposes. A Commission Rule shall be invalid and have not force or effect
only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid
because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is
beyond the scope of the purposes of this Compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
C. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each
Participating State, provided however that where the Rules of the Commission
conflict with the laws of the Participating State that establish the medical
services a PA may perform in the Participating State, as held by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in
that State to the extent of the conflict.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Participating States
rejects a Commission Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the
same manner used to adopt this Compact within four (4) years of the date of
adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect
in any Participating State or to any State applying to participate in the
Compact.
E. Commission Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting
of the Commission.
F. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final Rule or Rules by the
Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which
the Rule will be considered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a
Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
platform; and
2. To persons who have requested notice of the Commission’s
notices of proposed rulemaking, and
3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule specify.
G. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing on the
proposed Rule and the proposed time, date and location of the meeting in
which the proposed Rule will be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason for the proposed
Rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person and the date by which written comments must be received;
and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to
the Commission of their intention to attend the public hearing or provide any
written comments.
H. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall allow
persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall
be made available to the public.
I. If the hearing is to be held via electronic means, the Commission
shall publish the mechanism for access to the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall as
directed in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking, not less than five (5)
business days before the scheduled date of the hearing, notify the Commission
of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person
who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or
in writing.
3. All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the recording and
the written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments received in
response to the proposed rulemaking shall be made available to a person upon
request.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each proposed Rule. Proposed Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this section.
J. Following the public hearing the Commission shall consider all
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
written and oral comments timely received.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all delegates, take final
action on the proposed Rule and shall determine the effective date of the
Rule, if adopted, based on the Rulemaking record and the full text of the
Rule.
1. If adopted, the Rule shall be posted on the Commission’s
website.
2. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule
provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed
Rule.
3. The Commission shall provide on its website an explanation of
the reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as
reasons for substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
4. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date
for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection L, the
effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after the
Commission issued the notice that it adopted the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency Rule with twenty-four (24) hours prior
notice, without the opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that the
usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact and in this section
shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in
no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule.
For the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be
adopted immediately by the Commission in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Commission Rule
that is established by federal law or Rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted Commission Rule for purposes of
correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the
website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to
a Rule. A challenge shall be made as set forth in the notice of revisions and
delivered to the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no
challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If
the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
N. No Participating State’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under
this Compact.

Section 10. Oversight, Dispute Resolution, and Enforcement
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Participating State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions
necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety
of venue in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the
Compact or the Commission’s Rules and shall have standing to intervene in
such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the Commission with
service of process shall render a judgment or order in such proceeding void
as to the Commission, this Compact, or Commission Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Participating State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under
this Compact or the Commission Rules, the Commission shall provide written
notice to the defaulting State and other Participating States. The notice
shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default and any
other action that the Commission may take and shall offer remedial training
and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
2. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the
defaulting State may be terminated from this Compact upon an affirmative vote
of a majority of the delegates of the Participating States, and all rights,
privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact upon such State may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does
not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during
the period of default.
3. Termination of participation in this Compact shall be imposed
only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice
of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting State’s
legislature, and to the Licensing Board(s) of each of the Participating
States.
4. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date
of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date
of termination.
5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State
that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from this Compact,
unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting
State.
6. The defaulting State may appeal its termination from the
Compact by the Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
7. Upon the termination of a State’s participation in the
Compact, the State shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees within
that State of such termination:
a. Licensees who have been granted a Compact Privilege in
that State shall retain the Compact Privilege for one hundred eighty (180)
days following the effective date of such termination.
b. Licensees who are licensed in that State who have been
granted a Compact Privilege in a Participating State shall retain the Compact
Privilege for one hundred eighty (180) days unless the Licensee also has a
Qualifying License in a Participating State or obtains a Qualifying License
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
in a Participating State before the one hundred eighty (180)-day period ends,
in which case the Compact Privilege shall continue.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Participating State, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to this Compact that arise among
Participating States and between participating and non-Participating States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion,
shall enforce the provisions of this Compact and Rules of the Commission.
2. If compliance is not secured after all means to secure
compliance have been exhausted, by majority vote, the Commission may initiate
legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices,
against a Participating State in default to enforce compliance with the
provisions of this Compact and the Commission’s promulgated Rules and bylaws.
The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of
the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under
federal or State law.
E. Legal Action Against the Commission
1. A Participating State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its Rules. The relief
sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
2. No person other than a Participating State shall enforce this
Compact against the Commission.

Section 11. Date of Implementation of the PA Licensure Compact Commission
A. This Compact shall come into effect on the date on which this
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Participating State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the States that enacted the
Compact prior to the Commission convening (“Charter Participating States”) to
determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter Participating State is
materially different than the Model Compact.
a. A Charter Participating State whose enactment is found
to be materially different from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Section 10.B.
b. If any Participating State later withdraws from the
Compact or its participation is terminated, the Commission shall remain in
existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
Participating States should be less than seven. Participating States enacting
the Compact subsequent to the Commission convening shall be subject to the
process set forth in Section 7.C.21 to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for
participation in the Compact.
2. Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to the
seven initial Charter Participating States shall be subject to the process
set forth in Section 7.C.21 to determine if their enactments are materially
different from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for participation
in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the
effective date of the Compact or the Commission coming into existence shall
be considered to be actions of the Commission unless specifically repudiated
by the Commission.
B. Any State that joins this Compact shall be subject to the
Commission’s Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which this Compact
becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day this
Compact becomes law in that State.
C. Any Participating State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting
a statute repealing the same.
1. A Participating State’s withdrawal shall not take effect
until one hundred eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
During this one hundred eighty (180) day-period, all Compact Privileges that
were in effect in the withdrawing State and were granted to Licensees
licensed in the withdrawing State shall remain in effect. If any Licensee
licensed in the withdrawing State is also licensed in another Participating
State or obtains a license in another Participating State within the one
hundred eighty (180) days, the Licensee’s Compact Privileges in other
Participating States shall not be affected by the passage of the one hundred
eighty (180) days.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
State Licensing Board(s) of the withdrawing State to comply with the
investigative, and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this Compact
prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing a State from this
Compact, the State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
Licensees within that State. Such withdrawing State shall continue to
recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of one
hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any PA licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement
between Participating States and between a Participating State and non-
Participating State that does not conflict with the provisions of this
Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the Participating States. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any
Participating State until it is enacted materially in the same manner into
the laws of all Participating States as determined by the Commission.

Section 12. Construction and Severability
A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation
and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly
authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to
limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is held by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101
Participating State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of the
United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person
or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the
applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person or circumstance
shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B or this section, the Commission may
deny a State’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of Section 10.B, terminate a Participating State’s participation
in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a
Participating State is, or would be with respect to a State seeking to
participate in the Compact, a material departure from the Compact.
Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution
of any Participating State, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect
as to the remaining Participating States and in full force and effect as to
the Participating State affected as to all severable matters.

Section 13. Binding Effect of Compact
A. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a
Participating State that is not inconsistent with this Compact.
B. Any laws in a Participating State in conflict with this Compact are
superseded to the extent of the conflict.
C. All agreements between the Commission and the Participating States
are binding in accordance with their terms.

17-105-202. Administration of compact — Rules.
(a) The Arkansas State Medical Board is the Physician Assistant
Licensure Compact administrator for this state.
(b)(1) The board shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this
subchapter.
(2) Rules promulgated by the board under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section shall be consistent with the Physician Assistant Licensure
Compact necessary to implement this subchapter.
(c) The board is not required to adopt the rules of the Physician
Assistant Licensure Compact Commission for those rules to be effective in
this state.
02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB101

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Initial rules.
(a) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement this act.
(b) When adopting the initial rules to implement this act, the final
rules shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-
204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2025, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(c) The board shall file the proposed rule with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before
January 1, 2026.

/s/C. Penzo




















02-17-2025 11:13:38 JMB017